New York, session 2025-2026, S10421.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 25.11 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a 4 volunteer agency who is granted state aid by the office or pursuant to a 5 contract with a local governmental unit shall receive the full amount of 6 such state aid within sixty days from the time such state aid is 7 approved. Once a volunteer agency has received such state aid, such 8 volunteer agency shall utilize the full amount of such aid within two 9 years of receipt for purposes of providing substance use disorder, 10 treatment, compulsive gambling, prevention or other authorized services 11 and consistent with the provisions of this article. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11466-01-5